Massachusetts, session 194th, H371.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Boards of Health in cities and
towns shall not have the power to ban the community-wide sale of any legal consumer product
by authorized stores, establishments and any other entities legally allowed to sell such products
in the Commonwealth and within the existing by-laws of the community, wholesale or retail,
without receiving the approval of town meeting or city council to create such a by-law within the
city or town. This provision shall not interfere with a Board of Health’s ability to take action for
an emergency and immediate health concern for a specific consumer product or from a specific
location if a health code violation has otherwise occurred or some other emergency health issue
should arise so long as such action is not to ban the legal sale for the sake of doing so.
of 1